Maryland, session 2025, HB1402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Medical Assistance Program.
(i) “Program recipient” means an individual who receives benefits under the
Program.
15–123.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH MEMORANDUMS OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH FEDERAL AND STATE AGENCIES TO FACILITATE
DATA–SHARING IN ORDER TO CONDUCT:
(1) MONTHLY DEATH RECORD REVIEWS, USING THE VITAL
STATISTICS ADMINISTRATION DATABASE TO IDENTIFY DECEASED INDIVIDUALS
WHO ARE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS;
(2) QUARTERLY REVIEWS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, TO DETERMINE THE EFFECT OF EMPLOYMENT OR WAGE
CHANGES ON THE CONTINUING ELIGIBILITY OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS;
(3) QUARTERLY REVIEWS OF TAX FILINGS FROM THE COMPTROLLER
TO VERIFY INCOME AND RESIDENCY CHANGES OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS;
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING § 15–113 OF THIS SUBTITLE, MONTHLY
REVIEWS OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES, TO ENSURE
THAT INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS ARE NOT RECEIVING BENEFITS UNDER THE
PROGRAM; AND
(5) TWICE MONTHLY REVIEWS OF UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
BENEFITS RECORDS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
LABOR, TO VERIFY CHANGES IN EMPLOYMENT OR INCOME THAT MIGHT AFFECT THE
CONTINUING ELIGIBILITY OF PROGRAM RECIPIENTS USING:
(I) SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION EARNINGS AND DEATH
RECORDS;

HOUSE BILL 1402 3
(II) U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
NATIONAL DIRECTORY OF NEW HIRES;
(III) U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT RECORDS;
(IV) U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT PAYMENT AND EARNINGS DATA; AND
(V) FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION NATIONAL INSTANT
CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK SYSTEM RECORDS OF FUGITIVES FROM JUSTICE.
(B) WHEN DETERMINING PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
NOT ACCEPT SELF–ATTESTATION OF INCOME, RESIDENCY, HOUSEHOLD
COMPOSITION, OR OTHER ELIGIBILITY FACTORS, UNLESS REQUIRED BY FEDERAL
LAW.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SEEK APPROVAL FROM THE CENTERS FOR
MEDICARE AND MEDICAID SERVICES FOR A § 1115 WAIVER TO IMPOSE A 6–MONTH
LOCKOUT PERIOD FOR A PROGRAM RECIPIENT WHO:
(1) IS AT LEAST 19 YEARS OLD AND UNDER THE AGE OF 65 YEARS;
(2) FAILS TO REPORT A CHANGE IN ELIGIBILITY; AND
(3) IS NOT:
(I) DESIGNATED AS DISABLED BY A GOVERNMENT ENTITY; OR
(II) PREGNANT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING CONTROL
AGENCY SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT TO IDENTIFY THE NAMES OF EACH
PROGRAM RECIPIENT WHO HAS WON A PRIZE OF $3,000 OR MORE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE QUARTERLY
REPORTS ON INVESTIGATIONS AND COMPLIANCE FINDINGS RELATING TO PROGRAM
FRAUD, INCLUDING:
(1) THE NUMBER OF CASES INVESTIGATED;
(2) THE NUMBER OF CASES REFERRED FOR PROSECUTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1402
(3) THE PERCENTAGE OF INELIGIBLE PROGRAM RECIPIENTS
IDENTIFIED.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
Article – Human Services
5–501.
(a) (1) The Department may implement a Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program in accordance with the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
(2) The Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program shall include:
(i) a Restaurant Meals Program in accordance with § 5–505 of this
subtitle; and
(ii) a Heat and Eat Program in accordance with § 5–506 of this
subtitle.
(b) The State shall bear the nonfederal portion of the administrative costs of the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program for each county.
(c) Each local department shall administer the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program:
(1) under the supervision and control of the Department; and
(2) in accordance with the regulations of the Department and federal law.
(d) If a household includes an individual who is at least 60 years old and receives
a federally funded benefit in an amount less than $50 per month under the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program, the State shall provide a supplement to increase the total
benefit to $50 per month.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “PUBLIC ASSISTANCE” MEANS BENEFITS
PROVIDED UNDER THE SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH MEMORANDUMS OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH FEDERAL AND STATE AGENCIES TO FACILITATE
DATA–SHARING IN ORDER TO CONDUCT:

HOUSE BILL 1402 5
(I) MONTHLY DEATH RECORD REVIEWS USING THE VITAL
STATISTICS ADMINISTRATION DATABASE TO IDENTIFY DECEASED INDIVIDUALS
RECEIVING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE;
(II) QUARTERLY REVIEWS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, TO DETERMINE THE EFFECT OF EMPLOYMENT
OR WAGE CHANGES OF HOUSEHOLDS RECEIVING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE;
(III) MONTHLY REVIEWS OF OUT–OF–STATE ELECTRONIC
BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD TRANSACTIONS TO VERIFY THAT INDIVIDUALS
RECEIVING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE RESIDE IN THE STATE;
(IV) QUARTERLY REVIEWS OF TAX FILINGS FROM THE
COMPTROLLER TO IDENTIFY INCOME CHANGES OF HOUSEHOLDS RECEIVING
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE;
(V) MONTHLY REVIEWS OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL
SERVICES, TO ENSURE THAT INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS ARE NOT RECEIVING
PUBLIC ASSISTANCE; AND
(VI) TWICE MONTHLY REVIEWS OF UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE
BENEFITS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, TO
VERIFY CHANGES IN EMPLOYMENT OR INCOME ELIGIBILITY OF A HOUSEHOLD
RECEIVING PUBLIC ASSISTANCE USING THE FOLLOWING:
1. SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION EARNINGS AND
DEATH RECORDS;
2. U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES NATIONAL DIRECTORY OF NEW HIRES;
3. U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT RECORDS;
4. U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT PAYMENT AND EARNINGS DATA; AND
5. FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION NATIONAL
INSTANT CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECK SYSTEM RECORDS OF FUGITIVES FROM
JUSTICE.

HOUSE BILL 1402
(3) (I) WHEN DETERMINING ELIGIBILITY FOR PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPLY CATEGORICAL ELIGIBILITY UNDER
7 U.S.C. § 2014(A), UNLESS REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW.
(II) WHEN DETERMINING ELIGIBILITY FOR PUBLIC
ASSISTANCE, THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT APPLY A HIGHER GROSS INCOME
ELIGIBILITY STANDARD THAN THE GROSS INCOME ELIGIBILITY UNDER 7 U.S.C. §
2014(C), UNLESS REQUIRED BY FEDERAL LAW.
(4) A HOUSEHOLD ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE PUBLIC ASSISTANCE UNDER
FEDERAL AND STATE LAW SHALL REPORT A CHANGE IN CIRCUMSTANCES
AFFECTING ELIGIBILITY WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE CHANGE OCCURRED, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH 7 C.F.R. § 273.12(A)(1).
(5) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCIES, SHALL CONDUCT ANNUAL ON–SITE INSPECTIONS OF RETAIL FACILITIES
ACCEPTING ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD TRANSACTIONS TO IDENTIFY
POTENTIAL FRAUD.
(6) (I) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE LOTTERY AND GAMING
CONTROL AGENCY SHALL ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT TO IDENTIFY THE NAMES OF
EACH PUBLIC ASSISTANCE RECIPIENT WHO HAS WON A PRIZE OF $3,000 OR MORE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INVESTIGATE WHETHER A
HOUSEHOLD EXCEEDS RESOURCE ELIGIBILITY UNDER 7 C.F.R. § 273.8(B).
(7) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE QUARTERLY
REPORTS ON INVESTIGATIONS AND COMPLIANCE FINDINGS RELATING TO
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM FRAUD, INCLUDING:
(I) THE NUMBER OF HOUSEHOLDS INVESTIGATED;
(II) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS REFERRED FOR
PROSECUTION;
(III) THE TOTAL NUMBER AND AMOUNT OF IMPROPER PAYMENTS
RECOVERED;
(IV) THE PERCENTAGE OF INELIGIBLE RECIPIENTS IDENTIFIED;
AND
(V) THE TOTAL EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS ON OUT–OF–STATE
ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER CARD TRANSACTIONS.

HOUSE BILL 1402 7
(8) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.